Utah statutes.
58-37d-4.   Prohibited acts -- Second degree felony.

(1)  It is unlawful for any person to knowingly or intentionally:

(a)  possess a controlled substance precursor with the intent to engage in a clandestine laboratory operation;

(b)  possess laboratory equipment or supplies with the intent to engage in a clandestine laboratory operation;

(c)  sell, distribute, or otherwise supply a precursor chemical, laboratory equipment, or laboratory supplies, knowing or having reasonable cause to believe any of these items will be used for a clandestine laboratory operation;

(d)  evade the recordkeeping provisions of Title 58, Chapter 37c, Utah Controlled Substance Precursor Act, knowing or having reasonable cause to believe that the material distributed or received will be used for a clandestine laboratory operation;

(e)  conspire with or aid another to engage in a clandestine laboratory operation;

(f)  produce or manufacture, or possess with intent to produce or manufacture a controlled or counterfeit substance except as authorized under Title 58, Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substances Act;

(g)  transport or convey a controlled or counterfeit substance with the intent to distribute or to be distributed by the person transporting or conveying the controlled or counterfeit substance or by any other person regardless of whether the final destination for the distribution is within this state or any other location; or

(h)  engage in compounding, synthesis, concentration, purification, separation, extraction, or other physical or chemical processing of any substance, including a controlled substance precursor, or the packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a container holding a substance that is a product of any of these activities, knowing or having reasonable cause to believe that the substance is a product of any of these activities and will be used in the illegal manufacture of specified controlled substances.

(2)  A person who violates any provision of Subsection (1) is guilty of a second degree felony punishable by imprisonment for an indeterminate term of not less than 3 years nor more than 15 years.



Amended by Chapter 305, 2008 General Session

